Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.380

Construction contract provision waiving, releasing, etc., rights of contractor, etc., to damages or adjustment for unreasonable delay caused by contractee, etc.—Prospective application of RCW 4.24.360.

The provisions of RCW 4.24.360 shall apply to contracts or agreements entered into after September 1, 1979.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 264 s 3.]